Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202016-6,105
Construction of sewer and water mains; cost; revenue bonds; issuance authorized.

As an alternative to spending surplus funds as provided in section 16-6,104, or to pay for part of the construction of sanitary sewer mains or water mains, the mayor and city council may issue revenue bonds. Such revenue bonds shall not impose any general liability upon the city but shall be secured by the revenue received by the city for the operation of the sanitary sewer system or waterworks system, and the amount of connection fees collected by the city for connections to such sanitary sewer mains or water mains. Such revenue bonds shall be sold for not less than par and bear interest at a rate not to exceed the rate of interest specified in section 45-104.01, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted by the Legislature. The amount of such revenue bonds, either issued or outstanding, shall not be included in computing the maximum amount of bonds which the city may be authorized to issue under its charter or any statute of this state.

Laws 1969, c. 73, § 4, p. 398;

Laws 1980, LB 933, § 17;

Laws 1981, LB 167, § 18;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 168.